Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-111] Judicial power to excuse compliance with
requirements of declaration or bylaws. (a) The circuit court of the
judicial circuit in which a condominium is located may excuse compliance with
any of the following provisions in a declaration or bylaws if it finds that the
provision unreasonably interferes with the association's ability to manage the
common property, administer the condominium property regime, or carry out any
other function set forth in the declaration or bylaws, and that compliance is
not necessary to protect the legitimate interests of the members or lenders
holding security interests:

(1) A provision limiting the amount of any assessment
that can be levied against individually owned property;

(2) A provision requiring that an amendment to the
declaration or bylaws be approved by lenders;

(3) A provision requiring approval of at least
sixty-seven per cent of the common interest to adopt an amendment pursuant to
section 514B‑32(a)(11) or section 514B‑108(e); provided that the amendment
does not:

(A) Prohibit or materially restrict the use
or occupancy of, or behavior within, individually owned units;

(B) Change the basis for allocating voting
rights or assessments among unit owners; or

(C) Apply to less than all of the unit
owners;

(4) A requirement that an amendment to the
declaration be signed by unit owners; or

(5) A quorum requirement for meetings of unit owners.

(b) The board, on behalf of the association,
shall by certified mail provide all unit owners with notice of the date, time,
and place of any court hearing to be held pursuant to this section. [L 2004, c
164, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next